apertium-en-gl/apertium-en-gl.en.metadix
    <pardef n="hew__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hid/e__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>den</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="w/eave__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eave</l> 
        <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eave</l> 
        <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eaves</l> 
        <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ove</l> 
        <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oven</l> 
        <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eaving</l> 
        <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eaving</l> 
        <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eaving</l> 
        <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="le/ad__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ad</l> 
        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ad</l> 
        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ads</l> 
        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>d</l> 
        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>d</l> 
        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ading</l> 
        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ading</l> 
        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ading</l> 
        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="le/ave__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ave</l> 
        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ave</l> 
        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aves</l> 
        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ft</l> 
        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ft</l> 
        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aving</l> 
        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aving</l> 
        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aving</l> 
        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/ie__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ie</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ie</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ies</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ay</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ain</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lo/se__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>se</l> 
        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>se</l> 
        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ses</l> 
        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>st</l> 
        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>st</l> 
        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sing</l> 
        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sing</l> 
        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sing</l> 
        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ma/ke__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ke</l> 
        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ke</l> 
        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kes</l> 
        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>de</l> 
        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>de</l> 
        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>king</l> 
        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>king</l> 
        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>king</l> 
        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="hide">
        <i>hid</i> 
        <par n="hid/e__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="interweave">
        <i>interw</i> 
        <par n="w/eave__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="lead">
        <i>le</i> 
        <par n="le/ad__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="leave">
        <i>le</i> 
        <par n="le/ave__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="lose">
        <i>lo</i> 
        <par n="lo/se__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="make">
        <i>ma</i> 
        <par n="ma/ke__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="make a mistake">
        <i>ma</i> 
        <par n="ma/ke__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>a<b/>mistake</l> 
        <r><g><b/>a<b/>mistake</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="make sense">
	    <i>ma</i> 
	    <par n="ma/ke__vblex"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>sense</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>sense</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="make sense of">
	    <i>ma</i> 
	    <par n="ma/ke__vblex"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>sense<b/>of</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>sense<b/>of</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="sew">
        <i>sew</i> 
        <par n="hew__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="show">
        <i>show</i> 
        <par n="hew__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="show up">
        <i>show</i> 
        <par n="hew__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>up</l> 
        <r><g><b/>up</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="make money">
	    <i>ma</i> 
	    <par n="ma/ke__vblex"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>money</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>money</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="make up">
        <i>ma</i> 
        <par n="ma/ke__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>up</l> 
        <r><g><b/>up</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
